Illinois, session 104th, HB1504.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)8    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 9rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 10of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 11will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 12which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 13hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 14laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 15services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 16office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 17home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 18remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 19health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 20clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 21and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 22for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 23to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this   HB1504- 2 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 2corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 3a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 4physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 5dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 6a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 7optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 8diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 9services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 10intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 11disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 12disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 13and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 14adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 15assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 16includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 17referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 18instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 19transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 20(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 21in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 22Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 23sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 24discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 25arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 26treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by   HB1504- 3 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 2Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 3including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 4treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 5of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 6term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 7care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 8treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 10comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 11purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 12approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 13under the medical assistance program under this Article for 14persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 15Article. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 17reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 18shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 19persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 20under this Article. 21    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 22tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 23Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 24tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 25counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 26through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under   HB1504- 4 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 2eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 3shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 4federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 5433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 6through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 7limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 8interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 9administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 10developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 11Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1295.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 13understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 14plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 15Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 16Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 17approval.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 19Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 20for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 21physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 22test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 23other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 24documentation. 25    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 26Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department   HB1504- 5 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 2vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 3enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 4that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 5medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 6managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 7school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 8under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 9individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 10for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 11of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 12the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 13KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 14Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 15payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 16MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 17    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 18and Family Services may provide the following services to 19persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 20participating in education, training or employment programs 21operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 22the Department of Public Aid:23        (1) dental services provided by or under the 24    supervision of a dentist; and 25        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 26    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever   HB1504- 6 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    the person may select.2    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 3and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 4who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 5assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 6services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 7corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 8the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 9caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 10practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 11supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 12profession.13    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 14set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 15United States District Court for the Northern District of 16Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 17Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 18the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 19than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 20of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 21provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 22assistance program. 23    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 24the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 25deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 26dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in   HB1504- 7 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 2sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 3remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 4    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 5subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 6allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 7cost to render dental services through an enrolled 8not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 9enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 10assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 11include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 12Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 13Department, through which dental services covered under this 14Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 15process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 16dental services rendered under this provision. 17    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 18Department shall file administrative rules updating the 19Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 20by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 21    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 22and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 23school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 24delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 25to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 26establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers   HB1504- 8 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 2requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 3published by the Department that establishes the requirements 4for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 5Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 6developing the program requirements to consider the different 7geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 8State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 9provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 10to participate in the school-based dental program administered 11by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 12construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 13district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 14school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 15the school-based dental program administered by the 16Department. 17    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 18classify the medical services to be provided only in 19accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 205-2. 21    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 22provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 23elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 24diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 25short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 26a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental   HB1504- 9 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1formula is medically necessary. 2    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 3and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 4mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 5individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 6medical assistance under this Article, as follows:7        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 8    years of age. 9        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 10    age or older.11        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 12    medically necessary by the individual's health care 13    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 14    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 15    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 16    factors.17        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 18    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 19    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 20    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 21    practice medicine in all of its branches. 22        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 23    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 24    all of its branches. 25        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 26    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine   HB1504- 10 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 2    or physician assistant. 3    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 4copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 5coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 6sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 7to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 8health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 9pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 10U.S.C. 223). 11    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 12instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 13frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 14tool.15    For purposes of this Section:16    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 17diagnostic mammography.18    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 19is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 20an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 21subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 22breast.23    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 24breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 25including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 26image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of   HB1504- 11 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 2breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 3includes breast tomosynthesis.4    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 5involves the acquisition of projection images over the 6stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 7three-dimensional images of the breast.8    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 9Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 10agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 11the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 12Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 13would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 14Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 15111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 1618031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 17of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 18paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 19tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 20authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 21U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 22for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 23this paragraph.24    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 25that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 26include access to at least one breast imaging Center of   HB1504- 12 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 2Radiology.3    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 4quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 5be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 6same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 7increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 8January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 9breast tomosynthesis.10    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 11representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 12facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 13quality standards for mammography.14    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 15breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 16by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 17treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 18program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 19cancer treatment quality program.20    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 21representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 22treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 23doctors, including breast surgeons, reconstructive breast 24surgeons, oncologists, and primary care providers to establish 25quality standards for breast cancer treatment.26    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall   HB1504- 13 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 2qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 3These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 4hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 5Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 6of the provision set forth in this paragraph.7    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 8individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 9but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 10months, of the importance and benefit of screening 11mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 12cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 13reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 14their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 15evaluation.16    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 17primary care providers with respect to their female patients 18over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 19goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 20form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 21who meet that goal.22    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 23patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 24cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 25program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 26mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program   HB1504- 14 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 2site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 3after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 4include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 5Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 6metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 7be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 8those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 9situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 10    The Department shall require all networks of care to 11develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 12in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 13patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 14Department shall require all networks of care to include 15access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 16academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 17in-network covered benefit.18    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 19for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 20marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 21persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 22approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 23reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 24persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 25cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 26progression. The Department shall disallow any   HB1504- 15 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 2human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 3    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 4eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 5receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 612-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 7Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 8conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 9the Department.10    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 11recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 12prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 13disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 14referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 15licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 16hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 17The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 18coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 19addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 20Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 21of Human Services. 22    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 23pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 24from the Department on the availability of services under any 25program providing case management services for addicted 26individuals, including information on appropriate referrals   HB1504- 16 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1for other social services that may be needed by addicted 2individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 3    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 4Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 5of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 6a public awareness campaign, may provide information 7concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 8addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 9directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 10to recipients of medical assistance. 11    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 12nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 13recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 14abuse. 15    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 16governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 17as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 18advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 19the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 20providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 21information dissemination and educational activities for 22medical and health care providers, and consistency in 23procedures to the Illinois Department. 24    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 25Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 26for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code.   HB1504- 17 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 2projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 3represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 4rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 5Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 6require that the sponsor organization be a medical 7organization. 8    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 9medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 10outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 11alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 12necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 13Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 14obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 15medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 16in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 17the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 18        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 19    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 20    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 21    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 22    such services. 23        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 24    financial incentives to encourage the development of 25    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 26        (3) Persons receiving medical services through   HB1504- 18 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 2    services above the level usually offered through the 3    medical assistance program. 4    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 5qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 6delivery of high quality medical services. These 7qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 8Department and may be higher than qualifications for 9participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 10sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 11for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 12written approval of the Illinois Department. 13    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 14practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 15services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 16choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 17all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 18provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 19certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 20Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 21service providers. 22    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 23States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 24implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 25    The Illinois Department shall require health care 26providers to maintain records that document the medical care   HB1504- 19 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 2under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 3of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 4provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 5except that if an audit is initiated within the required 6retention period then the records must be retained until the 7audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 8Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 9make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 10the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 11providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 12Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 13medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 14business and professional records sufficient to fully and 15accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 16the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 17assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 18promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 19regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 20prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 21eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 22each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 23such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 24be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 25such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 26have put into effect and shall be operating a system of   HB1504- 20 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 2basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 3that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 4for which payment is being made are actually being received by 5eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 6(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 7Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 8for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 9medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 10and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 11the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 12updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 13Section 5-5.12. 14    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 15Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 16(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 17procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 18the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 19reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 20procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 21viability of the new system and implement any necessary 22operational or structural changes to its information 23technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 24acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 25    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 26Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15,   HB1504- 21 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b12014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 2procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 3Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 4MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 5purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 6Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 7viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 8operational or structural changes to its information 9technology platforms are implemented. 10    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 11medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 12group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 13Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 14all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 15interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 16associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 17institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 18health care services in this State under this Article. 19    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 20medical services desiring to participate in the medical 21assistance program established under this Article disclose, 22under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 23by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 24regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 25inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 26liens for the Illinois Department.   HB1504- 22 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 2period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 3period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 4the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 5the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 6Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 7disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 8process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 9penalty. 10    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 11enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 12of the vendor.13    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 14period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 15subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 16the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 17category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 18establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 19which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 20financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 21certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 22unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 23reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 24screening as required by federal or State law.25    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 26by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for   HB1504- 23 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 2screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 3federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 4the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 5each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 6hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 7of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 8the conditional enrollment period. 9    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 10payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 11resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 12by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 13later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 14medical goods or services were provided, with the following 15exceptions:16        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 17    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 18    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 19    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 20    complete.21        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 22    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 23    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 24    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 25    until the provider has been notified of the error.26        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois   HB1504- 24 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Department initiates the monthly billing process.2        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 3    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 4    when local government funds finance federal participation 5    for claims payments. 6    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 7a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 8filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 9applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 10Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 11to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 12adjudication by the primary payer.13    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 14calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 15prescreening information, new admissions with associated 16admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 17Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 18Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 19directly to the Department of Human Services using required 20admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 21documents, including all prescreening information, must be 22submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 23to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 24verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 25been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 26rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after   HB1504- 25 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1the admission transaction has been completed.2    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 3with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 4payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 5shall have no liability for payment of those claims.6    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 7privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 8agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 9access to confidential and other information and data 10necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 11other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 12limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 13certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 14reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 15employment; supplemental security income; social security 16numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 17National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 18exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 19corporate information; and death records.20    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 21State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 22into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 23which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 24for medical assistance program integrity functions and 25oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 26cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in   HB1504- 26 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 2appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 3minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 4the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 5agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 6agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 7but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 8Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 9Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 10Professional Regulation.11    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 12shall set forth a request for information to identify the 13benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 14claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 15and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 16rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 17adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 18data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 19clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 20post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 21management system with link analysis. Such a request for 22information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 23or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 24take any action or acquire any products or services. 25    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 26procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the   HB1504- 27 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 2devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 3provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 4immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 5and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 6medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 7consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 8the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 9maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 10rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 11alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 12or replacements of any device or equipment previously 13authorized for such recipient by the Department. 14Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 15the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 16wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 17wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 18and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 19methods other than actual acquisition costs.20    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 21durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 22organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 23Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 24bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 25recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 26of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers   HB1504- 28 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1must meet the accreditation requirement.2    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 3needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 4cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 5under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 6managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 7of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 8equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 9orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 10Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 11products and associated services) through the State's 12assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 13staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 14Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 15(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 16costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 17(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 18cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 19federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 20governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 21settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 22enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 23recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 24similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 25refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 26of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall   HB1504- 29 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 2new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 3authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 4organizations. 5    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 6prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 7Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 8effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 9eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 10non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 11development of non-institutional services in areas of the 12State where they are not currently available or are 13undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 14law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 15increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 1637 for applicants for institutional and home and 17community-based long term care; if and only if federal 18approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 19with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 20or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 21amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 222013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 23institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 24(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 25permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 26for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or   HB1504- 30 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 2to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 3Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 4agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 5institutional and home and community-based long term care 6interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 7implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 8community-based services in circumstances where federal 9approval has been granted. 10    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 11cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 12compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 13appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 14and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 15services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 16medical assistance under this Code. 17    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 18General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 191979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 20        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 21    medical services by public aid recipients; 22        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 23    the various medical services by medical vendors; 24        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 25    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 26        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the   HB1504- 31 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Illinois Department. 2    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 3ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 4include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 5Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 6Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 7required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 8Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 9Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 10as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 11Library Act. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 19rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 20any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 21of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 22with Section 5-5e. 23    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 24cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 25necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 26of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall   HB1504- 32 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 2renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 3benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 4of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 5requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 6under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 7kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 8emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 9Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 10certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 11and the services under this Section shall be limited to 12services associated with kidney transplantation. 13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 14contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved FDA 15approved forms of medication assisted treatment prescribed for 16the treatment of alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid 17dependence shall be covered under both fee-for-service and 18managed care medical assistance programs for persons who are 19otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article 20and shall not be subject to any (1) utilization control, other 21than those established under the American Society of Addiction 22Medicine patient placement criteria, (2) prior authorization 23mandate, (3) lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) 24limitations on dosage. 25    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 26for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the   HB1504- 33 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 2fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 3and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 4under the medical assistance program for persons who are 5otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 6As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 7binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 8opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 9to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 10approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 11Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 12provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 13assistance program.14    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 15coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 16marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 17are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 18United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 19pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 20services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 21transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 22transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 23counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 24individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 25risk of HIV infection.26    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section   HB1504- 34 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b11905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 2reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 3qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 4to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 5dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 6Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 7dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 8    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 9of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 10approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 11family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 12to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 13poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 14beginning no later than December 1, 2022.15    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 16and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 17electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 18(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 19I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 20Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 21(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 22the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 23become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 24subject to criteria established in accordance with all 25applicable laws.26    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code,   HB1504- 35 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 2interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 3assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 4Palliative Care Act.5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 612 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 7102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 8services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 9Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 10or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 11program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 12State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 13paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 14standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 16medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 17reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 18screening test for the presence of metachromatic 19leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 20Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 21Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 22provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 23subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 24hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 25tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 26Public Act 103-909) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General   HB1504- 36 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1Assembly to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and required 2to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than the fee 3charged by the Department of Public Health. The Department 4shall seek federal approval before the implementation of the 5newborn screening test fees by the Department of Public 6Health. 7    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 8beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 9cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 10person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 11impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 12Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 13under the medical assistance program for persons who are 14otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 16medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 17to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 18medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 19eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 20this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 21performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 22restore physical appearance. 23    No later than July 1, 2025, over-the-counter choline 24dietary supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered 25under the medical assistance program. 26(Source: P.A. 102-43, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 7-6-21;   HB1504- 37 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1102-43, Article 35, Section 35-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 255, Section 55-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-95, eff. 1-1-22; 102-123, 3eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-598, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-655, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-813, eff. 55-13-22; 102-1018, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 6102-1038, eff. 1-1-23; 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 71-1-24; 103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 8103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 91-1-24; 103-593, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, 10Article 90, Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 11103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; revised 1210-10-24.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)14    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 15rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 16of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 17will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 18which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 19hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 20laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 21services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 22office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 23home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 24remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 25health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9)   HB1504- 38 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 2and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 3for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 4to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 5item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 6corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 7a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 8physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 9dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 10a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 11optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 12diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 13services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 14intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 15disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 16disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 17and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 18adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 19assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 20includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 21referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 22instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 23transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 24(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 25in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 26Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the   HB1504- 39 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 2discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 3arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 4treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 5a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 6Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 7including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 8treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 9of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 10term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 11care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 12treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 14comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 15purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 16approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 17under the medical assistance program under this Article for 18persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 19Article. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 21reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 22shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 23persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 24under this Article. 25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 26tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States   HB1504- 40 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 2tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 3counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 4through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 5the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 6eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 7shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 8federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 9433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 10through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 11limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 12interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 13administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 14developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 15Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1695.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 17understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 18plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 19Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 20Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 21approval.22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 23Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 24for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 25physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 26test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose   HB1504- 41 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 2documentation. 3    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 4Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 5shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 6vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 7enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 8that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 9medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 10managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 11school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 12under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 13individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 14for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 15of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 16the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 17KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 18Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 19payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 20MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 21    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 22and Family Services may provide the following services to 23persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 24participating in education, training or employment programs 25operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 26the Department of Public Aid:  HB1504- 42 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1        (1) dental services provided by or under the 2    supervision of a dentist; and 3        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 4    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 5    the person may select.6    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 7and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 8who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 9assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 10services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 11corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 12the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 13caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 14practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 15supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 16profession.17    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 18set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 19United States District Court for the Northern District of 20Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 21Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 22the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 23than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 24of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 25provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 26assistance program.   HB1504- 43 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 2the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 3deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 4dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 5effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 6sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 7remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 9subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 10allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 11cost to render dental services through an enrolled 12not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 13enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 14assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 15include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 16Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 17Department, through which dental services covered under this 18Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 19process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 20dental services rendered under this provision. 21    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 22Department shall file administrative rules updating the 23Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 24by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 25    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 26and Family Services shall administer and regulate a   HB1504- 44 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 2delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 3to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 4establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 5and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 6requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 7published by the Department that establishes the requirements 8for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 9Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 10developing the program requirements to consider the different 11geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 12State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 13provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 14to participate in the school-based dental program administered 15by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 16construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 17district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 18school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 19the school-based dental program administered by the 20Department. 21    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 22classify the medical services to be provided only in 23accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 245-2. 25    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 26provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based   HB1504- 45 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 2diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 3short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 4a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 5formula is medically necessary. 6    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 7and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 8mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 9individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 10medical assistance under this Article, as follows:11        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 12    years of age. 13        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 14    age or older.15        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 16    medically necessary by the individual's health care 17    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 18    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 19    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 20    factors.21        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 22    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 23    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 24    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 25    practice medicine in all of its branches. 26        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as   HB1504- 46 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 2    all of its branches. 3        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 4    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 5    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 6    or physician assistant. 7        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 8    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 9    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 10    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 11    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 12    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 13    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 14copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 15coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 16sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 17to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 18health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 19pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 20U.S.C. 223). 21    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 22instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 23frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 24tool.25    For purposes of this Section:26    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using   HB1504- 47 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1diagnostic mammography.2    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 3is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 4an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 5subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 6breast.7    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 8breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 9including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 10image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 11less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 12breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 13includes breast tomosynthesis.14    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 15involves the acquisition of projection images over the 16stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 17three-dimensional images of the breast.18    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 19Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 20agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 21the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 22Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 23would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 24Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 25111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 2618031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost   HB1504- 48 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 2paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 3tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 4authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 5U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 6for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 7this paragraph.8    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 9that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 10include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 11Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 12Radiology.13    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 14quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 15be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 16same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 17increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 18January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 19breast tomosynthesis.20    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 21representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 22facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 23quality standards for mammography.24    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 25breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 26by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer   HB1504- 49 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 2program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 3cancer treatment quality program.4    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 5representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 6treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 7doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 8of FDA-approved FDA approved breast imaging technologies, 9breast surgeons, reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, 10and primary care providers to establish quality standards for 11breast cancer treatment.12    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 13establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 14qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 15These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 16hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 17Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 18of the provision set forth in this paragraph.19    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 20individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 21but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 22months, of the importance and benefit of screening 23mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 24cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 25reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 26their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the   HB1504- 50 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1evaluation.2    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 3primary care providers with respect to their female patients 4over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 5goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 6form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 7who meet that goal.8    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 9patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 10cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 11program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 12mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 13site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 14site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 15after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 16include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 17Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 18metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 19be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 20those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 21situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 22    The Department shall require all networks of care to 23develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 24in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 25patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 26Department shall require all networks of care to include   HB1504- 51 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 2academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 3in-network covered benefit.4    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 5for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 6marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 7persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 8approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 9reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 10persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 11cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 12progression. The Department shall disallow any 13preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 14human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 15    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 16eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 17receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 1812-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 19Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 20conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 21the Department.22    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 23recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 24prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 25disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 26referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program   HB1504- 52 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 2hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 3The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 4coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 5addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 6Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 7of Human Services. 8    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 9pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 10from the Department on the availability of services under any 11program providing case management services for addicted 12individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 13for other social services that may be needed by addicted 14individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 15    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 16Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 17of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 18a public awareness campaign, may provide information 19concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 20addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 21directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 22to recipients of medical assistance. 23    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 24nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 25recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 26abuse.   HB1504- 53 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 2governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 3as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 4advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 5the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 6providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 7information dissemination and educational activities for 8medical and health care providers, and consistency in 9procedures to the Illinois Department. 10    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 11Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 12for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 13Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 14projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 15represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 16rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 17Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 18require that the sponsor organization be a medical 19organization. 20    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 21medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 22outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 23alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 24necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 25Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 26obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse   HB1504- 54 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 2in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 3the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 4        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 5    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 6    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 7    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 8    such services. 9        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 10    financial incentives to encourage the development of 11    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 12        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 13    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 14    services above the level usually offered through the 15    medical assistance program. 16    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 17qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 18delivery of high quality medical services. These 19qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 20Department and may be higher than qualifications for 21participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 22sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 23for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 24written approval of the Illinois Department. 25    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 26practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical   HB1504- 55 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 2choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 3all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 4provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 5certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 6Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 7service providers. 8    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 9States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 10implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 11    The Illinois Department shall require health care 12providers to maintain records that document the medical care 13and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 14under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 15of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 16provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 17except that if an audit is initiated within the required 18retention period then the records must be retained until the 19audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 20Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 21make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 22the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 23providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 24Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 25medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 26business and professional records sufficient to fully and   HB1504- 56 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 2the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 3assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 4promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 5regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 6prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 7eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 8each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 9such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 10be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 11such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 12have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 13post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 14basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 15that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 16for which payment is being made are actually being received by 17eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 18(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 19Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 20for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 21medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 22and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 23the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 24updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 25Section 5-5.12. 26    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the   HB1504- 57 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 2(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 3procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 4the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 5reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 6procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 7viability of the new system and implement any necessary 8operational or structural changes to its information 9technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 10acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 11    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 12Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 132014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 14procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 15Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 16MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 17purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 18Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 19viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 20operational or structural changes to its information 21technology platforms are implemented. 22    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 23medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 24group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 25Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 26all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other   HB1504- 58 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 2associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 3institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 4health care services in this State under this Article. 5    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 6medical services desiring to participate in the medical 7assistance program established under this Article disclose, 8under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 9by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 10regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 11inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 12liens for the Illinois Department. 13    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 14period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 15period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 16the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 17the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 18Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 19disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 20process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 21penalty. 22    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 23enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 24of the vendor.25    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 26period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be   HB1504- 59 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 2the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 3category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 4establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 5which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 6financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 7certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 8unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 9reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 10screening as required by federal or State law.11    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 12by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 13each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 14screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 15federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 16the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 17each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 18hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 19of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 20the conditional enrollment period. 21    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 22payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 23resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 24by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 25later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 26medical goods or services were provided, with the following   HB1504- 60 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1exceptions:2        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 3    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 4    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 5    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 6    complete.7        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 8    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 9    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 10    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 11    until the provider has been notified of the error.12        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 13    Department initiates the monthly billing process.14        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 15    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 16    when local government funds finance federal participation 17    for claims payments. 18    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 19a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 20filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 21applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 22Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 23to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 24adjudication by the primary payer.25    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 26calendar days of receipt by the facility of required   HB1504- 61 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1prescreening information, new admissions with associated 2admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 3Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 4Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 5directly to the Department of Human Services using required 6admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 7documents, including all prescreening information, must be 8submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 9to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 10verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 11been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 12rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 13the admission transaction has been completed.14    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 15with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 16payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 17shall have no liability for payment of those claims.18    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 19privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 20agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 21access to confidential and other information and data 22necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 23other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 24limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 25certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 26reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income;   HB1504- 62 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1employment; supplemental security income; social security 2numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 3National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 4exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 5corporate information; and death records.6    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 7State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 8into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 9which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 10for medical assistance program integrity functions and 11oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 12cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 13compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 14appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 15minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 16the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 17agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 18agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 19but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 20Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 21Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 22Professional Regulation.23    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 24shall set forth a request for information to identify the 25benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 26claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing   HB1504- 63 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 2rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 3adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 4data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 5clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 6post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 7management system with link analysis. Such a request for 8information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 9or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 10take any action or acquire any products or services. 11    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 12procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 13acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 14devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 15provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 16immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 17and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 18medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 19consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 20the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 21maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 22rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 23alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 24or replacements of any device or equipment previously 25authorized for such recipient by the Department. 26Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary,   HB1504- 64 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 2wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 3wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 4and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 5methods other than actual acquisition costs.6    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 7durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 8organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 9Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 10bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 11recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 12of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 13must meet the accreditation requirement.14    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 15needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 16cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 17under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 18managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 19of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 20equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 21orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 22Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 23products and associated services) through the State's 24assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 25staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 26Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment:   HB1504- 65 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 2costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 3(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 4cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 5federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 6governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 7settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 8enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 9recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 10similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 11refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 12of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 13be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 14new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 15authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 16organizations. 17    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 18prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 19Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 20effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 21eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 22non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 23development of non-institutional services in areas of the 24State where they are not currently available or are 25undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 26law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an   HB1504- 66 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 237 for applicants for institutional and home and 3community-based long term care; if and only if federal 4approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 5with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 6or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 7amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 82013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 9institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 10(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 11permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 12for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 13receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 14to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 15Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 16agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 17institutional and home and community-based long term care 18interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 19implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 20community-based services in circumstances where federal 21approval has been granted. 22    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 23cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 24compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 25appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 26and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care   HB1504- 67 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 2medical assistance under this Code. 3    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 4General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 51979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 6        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 7    medical services by public aid recipients; 8        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 9    the various medical services by medical vendors; 10        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 11    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 12        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 13    Illinois Department. 14    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 15ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 16include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 17Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 18Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 19required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 20Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 21Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 22as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 23Library Act. 24    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 25any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 26with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB1504- 68 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 2Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 3whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 5rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 6any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 7of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 8with Section 5-5e. 9    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 10cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 11necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 12of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 13cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 14renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 15benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 16of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 17requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 18under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 19kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 20emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 21Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 22certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 23and the services under this Section shall be limited to 24services associated with kidney transplantation. 25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 26contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved FDA   HB1504- 69 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1approved forms of medication assisted treatment prescribed for 2the treatment of alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid 3dependence shall be covered under both fee-for-service and 4managed care medical assistance programs for persons who are 5otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article 6and shall not be subject to any (1) utilization control, other 7than those established under the American Society of Addiction 8Medicine patient placement criteria, (2) prior authorization 9mandate, (3) lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) 10limitations on dosage. 11    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 12for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 13medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 14fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 15and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 16under the medical assistance program for persons who are 17otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 18As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 19binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 20opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 21to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 22approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 23Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 24provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 25assistance program.26    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide   HB1504- 70 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 2marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 3are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 4United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 5pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 6services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 7transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 8transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 9counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 10individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 11risk of HIV infection.12    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 131905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 14reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 15qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 16to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 17dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 18Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 19dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 20    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 21of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 22approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 23family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 24to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 25poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 26beginning no later than December 1, 2022.  HB1504- 71 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 2and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 3electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 4(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 5I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 6Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 7(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 8the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 9become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 10subject to criteria established in accordance with all 11applicable laws.12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 13community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 14interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 15assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 16Palliative Care Act.17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 1812 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 19102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 20services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 21Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 22or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 23program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 24State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 25paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 26standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph.   HB1504- 72 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 2medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 3reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 4screening test for the presence of metachromatic 5leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 6Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 7Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 9subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 10hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 11tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 12Public Act 103-909) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 13Assembly to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and required 14to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than the fee 15charged by the Department of Public Health. The Department 16shall seek federal approval before the implementation of the 17newborn screening test fees by the Department of Public 18Health. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 20beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 21cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 22person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 23impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 24Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 25under the medical assistance program for persons who are 26otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article.   HB1504- 73 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 2medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 3to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 4medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 5eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 6this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 7performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 8restore physical appearance. 9    No later than July 1, 2025, over-the-counter choline 10dietary supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered 11under the medical assistance program. 12(Source: P.A. 102-43, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 7-6-21; 13102-43, Article 35, Section 35-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 1455, Section 55-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-95, eff. 1-1-22; 102-123, 15eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-598, eff. 1-1-22; 16102-655, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-813, eff. 175-13-22; 102-1018, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 18102-1038, eff. 1-1-23; 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 191-1-24; 103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 211-1-24; 103-593, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, 22Article 90, Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 23103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 248-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   HB1504- 74 -LRB104 08529 KTG 18581 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.